Maryland, session 2026, HB0128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–148.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “HANDLER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES CARE AND
TRAINING FOR A THERAPY DOG.
(3) “THERAPY DOG” MEANS A DOG THAT IS:
(I) TRAINED TO PROVIDE AFFECTION AND COMFORT TO
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0128*

HOUSE BILL 128
CHILDREN WHO NEED EMOTIONAL SUPPORT IN A SCHOOL SETTING; AND
(II) CERTIFIED OR REGISTERED AS A THERAPY DOG.
(B) (1) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL ALLOW THE USE OF THERAPY DOGS IN
PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY.
(2) EACH THERAPY DOG USED IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL BE
ACCOMPANIED BY A HANDLER.
(C) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ADOPT A POLICY FOR THE USE AND
HANDLING OF THERAPY DOGS IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY.
(2) THE POLICY REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) LOCAL OR NATIONAL CERTIFICATION OR REGISTRATION
REQUIREMENTS FOR THERAPY DOGS;
(II) GUIDELINES FOR HANDLERS OF THERAPY DOGS;
(III) GUIDELINES FOR WHEN AND WHERE THERAPY DOGS AND
HANDLERS ARE ALLOWED IN SCHOOL BUILDINGS;
(IV) NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOR PARENTS, STUDENTS,
AND SCHOOL FACULTY AND STAFF; AND
(V) GUIDELINES FOR THE MANAGEMENT OF STUDENTS AND
STAFF WITH ALLERGIES TO DOGS OR WHO ARE UNCOMFORTABLE AROUND DOGS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.